Tennessee, session 114, SB0344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 49, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Each LEA and public charter school shall require at least one (1) full-time
employee at each school under its jurisdiction to annually receive training in seizure
safety and first aid to assist students and staff in the event of an emergency.
(b) The training required for public and nonpublic school personnel who
volunteer, pursuant to § 49-50-1602(g), to assist in the administration of anti-seizure
medications to a student in an emergency situation, satisfies the training required in
subsection (a) if it also includes training in seizure safety and first aid.
(c)
(1) An LEA or public charter school is not liable for any personal injury
that results from an act or omission of an employee who is trained in seizure
safety and first aid for purposes of this section, if the employee's act or omission
does not amount to willful or wanton misconduct or gross negligence.
(2) An employee of an LEA or public charter school who is trained in
seizure safety and first aid for purposes of this section is not liable for any
personal injury that results from an act or omission of the employee, if the act or
omission does not amount to willful or wanton misconduct or gross negligence.
SB0344
002046
- 1 -

(d) For purposes of this section, "employee" does not include a school nurse
who is employed or under contract with the LEA or public charter school.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002046